Utah statutes.
78B-2-114.   Separate trial of statute of limitations issue in malpractice
actions.
(1)  An issue raised by the defense regarding the statute of limitations in a
case may be tried separately if the action is for professional negligence or
for rendering professional services without consent, and against:
(a)  a physician;
(b)  a surgeon;
(c)  a dentist;
(d)  an osteopathic physician;
(e)  a chiropractor;
(f)  a physical therapist;
(g)  a registered nurse;
(h)  a clinical laboratory bioanalyst;
(i)  a clinical laboratory technologist; or
(j)  a licensed hospital, person, firm, or corporation as the employer of any
of the persons in Subsection (1)(a) through (i).
(2)  The issue raised may be tried before any other issues in the case are
tried. If the issue raised by the defense of the statute of limitations is
finally determined in favor of the plaintiff, the remaining issues shall then
be tried.
